Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [121A.12] DISPLAY OF TEN COMMANDMENTS. new text end new text begin (a) A public elementary or secondary school shall display in a conspicuous place in each classroom of the school a durable poster or framed copy of the Ten Commandments that meets the requirements of paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (b) A poster or framed copy of the Ten Commandments must: new text end new text begin (1) include the text of the Ten Commandments as provided by paragraph (c) in a size and typeface that is legible to a person with average vision from anywhere in the classroom in which the poster or framed copy is displayed; and new text end new text begin (2) be at least 16 inches wide and 20 inches tall. new text end new text begin (c) The text of the poster or framed copy of the Ten Commandments must read as follows: new text end new text begin "The Ten Commandments new text end new text begin I AM the LORD thy God. Thou shalt have no other gods before me. new text end new text begin Thou shalt not make to thyself any graven images. new text end new text begin Thou shalt not take the Name of the Lord thy God in vain. new text end new text begin Remember the Sabbath day, to keep it holy. new text end new text begin Honor thy father and thy mother, that thy days may be long upon the land which the Lord thy God giveth thee. new text end new text begin Thou shalt not kill. new text end new text begin Thou shalt not commit adultery. new text end new text begin Thou shalt not steal. new text end new text begin Thou shalt not bear false witness against thy neighbor. new text end new text begin Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor's house. Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor's wife, nor his manservant, nor his maidservant, nor his cattle, nor anything that is thy neighbor's." new text end new text begin (d) A public elementary or secondary school in which each classroom does not include a poster or framed copy of the Ten Commandments must: new text end new text begin (1) accept any offer of a privately donated poster or framed copy of the Ten Commandments provided that the poster or copy meets the requirements of paragraph (b) and does not contain any additional content; and new text end new text begin (2) display the poster or framed copy as required under paragraph (a). new text end new text begin (e) A public elementary or secondary school displaying a poster or framed copy of the Ten Commandments in any classroom that does not meet the requirements of paragraph (b) may replace the poster or copy with one that meets the requirements of paragraph (b) using public funds or by accepting a private donation. new text end new text begin (f) A public elementary or secondary school must offer a poster or framed copy of the Ten Commandments in the school's possession that is not needed for display in a classroom as a donation to another public elementary or secondary school. new text end